zh-TW: 哨頭材質: ABS 塑膠; 鋁; 黃銅; 複合材質; Delrin/縮醛; 其他塑膠; PVC; 木材; 其他
pl: Materiał głowicy gwizdka: ABS; Aluminium; Mosiądz; Kompozyt; Delrin / Acetal; Inne tworzywo sztuczne; PVC; Drewno; Inne
pt-BR: Material da ponta do apito: Plástico ABS; Alumínio; Latão; Material composto; Delrin/Acetal; Outro plástico; PVC; Madeira; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál hlavy píšťalky: ABS plast; Hliník; Mosadz; Kompozit; Delrín/acetál; Iný plast; PVC; Drevo; Iné
en: Whistle head material: ABS plastic; Aluminum; Brass; Composite; Delrin/Acetal; Other plastic; PVC; Wood; Other
lt-LT: Švilpuko galvutės medžiaga: ABS plastikas; Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Kompozitas; „Delrin“ / acetalis; Kitas plastikas; PVC; Medis; Kita
vi: Chất liệu đầu còi: Nhựa ABS; Nhôm; Đồng thau; Composite; Delrin/Acetal; Nhựa khác; PVC; Gỗ; Khác
el: Υλικό κεφαλής σφυρίχτρας: Πλαστικό ABS; Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Σύνθετο υλικό; Delrin/Ακετάλη; Άλλο πλαστικό; PVC; Ξύλο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 哨头材质: ABS 塑料; 铝; 黄铜; 复合材料; 聚甲醛/缩醛; 其他塑料; PVC; 木材; 其他
de: Material des Tin-Whistle-Kopfs: ABS-Kunststoff; Aluminium; Messing; Verbundwerkstoff; Delrin/Acetal; Anderer Kunststoff; PVC; Holz; Andere
es: Material de la cabeza del silbato: Plástico ABS; Aluminio; Latón; Compuesto; Delrin/acetal; Otro plástico; PVC; Madera; Otro
ja: ホイッスルヘッド素材: ABS プラスチック; アルミニウム; 真鍮; コンポジット; デルリン/アセタール; その他プラスチック; PVC; 木製; その他
sv: Material i visselpipans munstycke: ABS-plast; Aluminium; Mässing; Komposit; Delrin/Acetal; Annan plast; PVC; Trä; Övrigt
fr: Matériau de la tête du sifflet: Plastique ABS; Aluminium; Laiton; Composite; Delrin/Acétal; Autre plastique; PVC; Bois; Autre
tr: Düdük başlık malzemesi: ABS plastik; Alüminyum; Pirinç; Kompozit; Delrin/Asetal; Diğer plastik; PVC; Ahşap; Diğer
it: Materiale della testa del fischietto: Plastica ABS; Alluminio; Ottone; Composito; Delrin/acetale; Altra plastica; PVC; Legno; Altro
da: Materiale i fløjtehoved: ABS-plast; Aluminium; Messing; Komposit; Delrin/acetal; Anden plastik; PVC; Træ; Andet
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำหัวนกหวีด: พลาสติก ABS; อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; คอมโพสิต; เดลริน/อะซีตัล; พลาสติกอื่นๆ; PVC; ไม้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material da cabeça dã flauta celta: Plástico ABS; Alumínio; Latão; Compósito; Delrin/acetal; Outro plástico; PVC; Madeira; Outro
fi: Pillin pään materiaali: ABS-muovi; Alumiini; Messinki; Komposiitti; Delrin/asetaali; Muu muovi; PVC; Puu; Muu
bg-BG: Материал на главата на свирката: ABS пластмаса; Алуминий; Месинг; Композитен материал; Делрин/ацетал; Друга пластмаса; PVC; Дърво; Друго
ru: Материал головки свистка: АБС-пластик; Алюминий; Латунь; Композит; Делрин/ацеталь; Другой пластик; ПВХ; Дерево; Другое
nb: Materiale i fløytehode: ABS-plast; Aluminium; Messing; Kompositt; Delrin/acetal; Annen plast; PVC; Tre; Annet
hu: Síphangkeltő fej anyaga: ABS műanyag; Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Kompozit; Delrin/Acetál; Egyéb műanyag; PVC; Fa; Egyéb
nl: Mondstukmateriaal fluitje: ABS-kunststof; Aluminium; Messing; Composiet; Delrin/Acetaal; Andere kunststof; PVC; Hout; Overig
ro-RO: Material al muștiucului pentru fluier: Plastic ABS; Aluminiu; Alamă; Compozit; Delrin/Acetal; Alt plastic; PVC; Lemn; Altele
sl-SI: Material glave piščali: Plastika ABS; Aluminij; Medenina; Kompozit; Delrin/Acetal; Druga plastika; PVC; Les; Drugo
ko: 휘슬 헤드 소재: ABS 플라스틱; 알루미늄; 황동; 복합 소재; 델린/아세탈; 기타 플라스틱; PVC; 목재; 기타
hr-HR: Materijal glave zviždaljke: ABS plastika; Aluminij; Mjed; Kompozitni materijal; Delrin / Acetal; Ostala plastika; PVC; Drvo; Ostalo
cs: Materiál hlavy píšťalky: ABS plast; Hliník; Mosaz; Kompozit; Delrin/Acetal; Jiný plast; PVC; Dřevo; Jiný